Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-391
Combined certificate and receipt for
fees; county treasurer; report; contents.

The county treasurer shall issue a combined certificate
and receipt for all fees received for the registration of motor vehicles or
trailers to the applicant for registration and forward an electronic copy
of the combined application and receipt to the department in a form prescribed
by the department. Each county treasurer shall make a report to the department
of the number of original registrations of motor vehicles or trailers registered
in the rural areas of the county and of the number of original registrations
of motor vehicles or trailers registered in each incorporated city and village
in the county during each month, on or before the twenty-fifth day of the
succeeding month. The department shall prescribe the form of such report.
When any county treasurer fails to file such report, the department
shall notify the county board of such county and the Director of
Administrative Services who shall immediately suspend any payments to such
county for highway purposes until the required reports are submitted.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 91;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 60.